Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-207
License; issuance; department; powers and duties.

The department shall issue a license as an advanced practice registered nurse to a registered nurse who meets the requirements of subsection (1) or (3) of section 38-208. The department may issue a license as an advanced practice registered nurse to a registered nurse pursuant to subsection (2) of section 38-208.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 41;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,136;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 146.